Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 1. In General

§ 42-1-101.
Definitions; generally.

As used in this title:

“Applicant” means any person applying for benefits under programs provided pursuant to this title;

“Department” means the department of family services unless otherwise specified;

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 4.

“Field office” means each field office of the department located within each county or region of the state;

“Recipient” means any person receiving benefits under programs provided pursuant to this title.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, §§ 1, 5, 6; 1941, ch. 125, §§ 1, 5, 6; C.S. 1945, §§ 25-101, 25-105, 25-106; Laws 1947, ch. 164, §§ 1 to 3; 1949, ch. 50, § 1; 1951, ch. 98, §§ 1 to 3; 1957, ch. 177, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1957, § 42-2, 42-38, 42-42; Laws 1959, ch. 156, § 1; 1965, ch. 90, § 2; 1967, ch. 195, § 1; 1969, ch. 194, § 4; 1971, ch. 220, §§ 1, 2; ch. 221, § 2; 1975, ch. 84, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, §§

42-1-102

,

42-2-101

,

42-2-102

; Laws 1979, ch. 155, §§ 2, 3; 1981, ch. 118, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 43, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, §§ 3, 4; 2016 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added “unless otherwise specified” at the end of (a)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Department of Health v. Dairyland Ins. Co., 11 P.3d 348,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Davidson v. Sherman, 848 P.2d 1341,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Paying for Nursing Home Care: Medicaid and Planned Poverty,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 471 (1990).

§ 42-1-102.
Conflict with federal laws.

If any provision of this title or W.S.

14-2-1001

through

14-2-1008

is found to be in conflict with federal law or to come in conflict with federal law due to new federal enactments, the department shall:

Follow the state rather than the federal law to the extent possible without incurring federal sanctions;

Seek any waivers from the federal government which appear to be appropriate and feasible to permit continued use of the provisions of state law;

Notify the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the legislature of the conflict and the steps necessary to resolve the conflict; and

If necessary to avoid federal sanctions with significant adverse effects on the state or the people of Wyoming, implement the federal law until sixty (60) days after the end of the general or budget legislative session following the discovery of the conflict. This period may be extended by the governor until sixty (60) days after the end of the next legislative session if a waiver request is pending before the appropriate federal agency at the start of a legislative session.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 111, § 1; 2018 ch. 131, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “or W.S.

14-2-1001

through

14-2-1008

.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.